California, session 20252026, SB581.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Fight for Firefighters Act of 2025.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 19846.2 is added to the Government Code, to read:19846.2. (a) The Department of Human Resources, the State Personnel Board, and any other relevant state agency shall take the necessary actions to transition seasonal firefighters employed by the Firefighter I classification within the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CAL FIRE) to a permanent firefighter employment classification.(b) The transition of the Firefighter I classification into a permanent employment classification shall include meeting and conferring in good faith between the exclusive representative and the state employer pursuant to Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1. The bargaining process shall include wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment for affected employees during and after the transition.